test/tools/stress.random-lexicons-100.lexc
LEXICON N41	
+N41:maeu	Cases ;
+N41:mlzå	Cases ;
+N41:mnsq	Cases ;
+N41:mizl	Cases ;
+N41:msld	Cases ;
+N41:mrve	Cases ;
+N41:mdåh	Cases ;
+N41:mbze	Cases ;
+N41:mora	Cases ;
+N41:mwqq	Cases ;
+N41:mqpk	Cases ;
+N41:mnyt	Cases ;
+N41:mtpv	Cases ;
+N41:mnef	Cases ;
+N41:mpgr	Cases ;
+N41:meaz	Cases ;
+N41:mtmf	Cases ;
+N41:mgjv	Cases ;
+N41:medf	Cases ;
+N41:mycw	Cases ;
+N41:mzdg	Cases ;
+N41:måny	Cases ;
+N41:msön	Cases ;
+N41:mxvu	Cases ;
+N41:mytq	Cases ;
+N41:mgcå	Cases ;
+N41:mudä	Cases ;
+N41:mbzt	Cases ;
+N41:msnp	Cases ;
+N41:moco	Cases ;
+N41:mnyi	Cases ;
+N41:mene	Cases ;
+N41:måck	Cases ;
+N41:mvch	Cases ;
+N41:mlix	Cases ;
+N41:måon	Cases ;
+N41:mtcd	Cases ;
+N41:mköl	Cases ;
+N41:mörä	Cases ;
+N41:mcqw	Cases ;
+N41:mqia	Cases ;
+N41:mnhf	Cases ;
+N41:möqp	Cases ;
+N41:meåk	Cases ;
+N41:mouc	Cases ;
+N41:mjrk	Cases ;
+N41:mbäa	Cases ;
+N41:mööå	Cases ;
+N41:mjxö	Cases ;
+N41:mözb	Cases ;
+N41:mugg	Cases ;
+N41:mtej	Cases ;
+N41:mbåu	Cases ;
+N41:mkjä	Cases ;
+N41:mtdu	Cases ;
+N41:maåv	Cases ;
+N41:mmvo	Cases ;
+N41:mjsp	Cases ;
+N41:mrkd	Cases ;
+N41:mlxs	Cases ;
+N41:mhag	Cases ;
+N41:mmmw	Cases ;
+N41:mbst	Cases ;
+N41:muri	Cases ;
+N41:måfr	Cases ;
+N41:mrpa	Cases ;
+N41:mlmt	Cases ;
+N41:miår	Cases ;
+N41:mdrä	Cases ;
+N41:mågr	Cases ;
+N41:mvån	Cases ;
+N41:mpms	Cases ;
+N41:mlön	Cases ;
+N41:mvåw	Cases ;
+N41:mshx	Cases ;
+N41:mqyn	Cases ;
+N41:mpäw	Cases ;
+N41:mnew	Cases ;
+N41:muix	Cases ;
+N41:mäöm	Cases ;
+N41:mqkp	Cases ;
+N41:mtgn	Cases ;
+N41:måme	Cases ;
+N41:mäåf	Cases ;
+N41:mbkc	Cases ;
+N41:mäul	Cases ;
+N41:mntb	Cases ;
+N41:mqqo	Cases ;
+N41:mvkm	Cases ;
+N41:mszq	Cases ;
+N41:måtd	Cases ;
+N41:mvvm	Cases ;
+N41:mfzp	Cases ;
+N41:moiö	Cases ;
+N41:mvlz	Cases ;
+N41:mgot	Cases ;
+N41:möha	Cases ;
+N41:märi	Cases ;
+N41:milh	Cases ;


LEXICON N42	
+N42:növy	Cases ;
+N42:npcu	Cases ;
+N42:nodi	Cases ;
+N42:nkgi	Cases ;
+N42:nxqz	Cases ;
+N42:nbpi	Cases ;
+N42:nåcb	Cases ;
+N42:nxåp	Cases ;
+N42:ngäw	Cases ;
+N42:nphb	Cases ;
+N42:näri	Cases ;
+N42:ngzn	Cases ;
+N42:npaz	Cases ;
+N42:nyfk	Cases ;
+N42:nåuj	Cases ;
+N42:nåtv	Cases ;
+N42:nusy	Cases ;
+N42:näut	Cases ;
+N42:nnis	Cases ;
+N42:nexu	Cases ;
+N42:nåid	Cases ;
+N42:nqio	Cases ;
+N42:nsrj	Cases ;
+N42:nuco	Cases ;
+N42:nvaz	Cases ;
+N42:njgx	Cases ;
+N42:ntut	Cases ;
+N42:nmrn	Cases ;
+N42:nföy	Cases ;
+N42:nmuk	Cases ;
+N42:nzää	Cases ;
+N42:nanä	Cases ;
+N42:nrcå	Cases ;
+N42:ndti	Cases ;
+N42:nåpx	Cases ;
+N42:nmöy	Cases ;
+N42:nbeg	Cases ;
+N42:navj	Cases ;
+N42:ncmä	Cases ;
+N42:nrld	Cases ;
+N42:nfnw	Cases ;
+N42:nmrb	Cases ;
+N42:nroo	Cases ;
+N42:nzuk	Cases ;
+N42:nåji	Cases ;
+N42:nbdc	Cases ;
+N42:nögb	Cases ;
+N42:nsdk	Cases ;
+N42:nkcl	Cases ;
+N42:npöm	Cases ;
+N42:ndmf	Cases ;
+N42:nzps	Cases ;
+N42:nlxh	Cases ;
+N42:nhkm	Cases ;
+N42:nxrv	Cases ;
+N42:nzzs	Cases ;
+N42:nqjd	Cases ;
+N42:nruä	Cases ;
+N42:nszj	Cases ;
+N42:nwxl	Cases ;
+N42:nbvj	Cases ;
+N42:nåld	Cases ;
+N42:nnkc	Cases ;
+N42:nngr	Cases ;
+N42:nctv	Cases ;
+N42:nurb	Cases ;
+N42:npöj	Cases ;
+N42:nmla	Cases ;
+N42:nkab	Cases ;
+N42:nqtj	Cases ;
+N42:nsäl	Cases ;
+N42:njpö	Cases ;
+N42:nqin	Cases ;
+N42:nuni	Cases ;
+N42:njbb	Cases ;
+N42:nmvv	Cases ;
+N42:naöö	Cases ;
+N42:nhdg	Cases ;
+N42:nväy	Cases ;
+N42:nipa	Cases ;
+N42:nlkg	Cases ;
+N42:nfff	Cases ;
+N42:nänm	Cases ;
+N42:ngzr	Cases ;
+N42:nqah	Cases ;
+N42:nsth	Cases ;
+N42:ncsä	Cases ;
+N42:nqcm	Cases ;
+N42:nent	Cases ;
+N42:nwda	Cases ;
+N42:nriq	Cases ;
+N42:ndpl	Cases ;
+N42:ndaä	Cases ;
+N42:nzou	Cases ;
+N42:nmga	Cases ;
+N42:nkmi	Cases ;
+N42:nvop	Cases ;
+N42:ngyj	Cases ;
+N42:numå	Cases ;


LEXICON N43	
+N43:oubp	Cases ;
+N43:oeqå	Cases ;
+N43:oaty	Cases ;
+N43:othh	Cases ;
+N43:ouhd	Cases ;
+N43:ogpc	Cases ;
+N43:oghy	Cases ;
+N43:oäks	Cases ;
+N43:ocqk	Cases ;
+N43:ohkx	Cases ;
+N43:omvb	Cases ;
+N43:ozbå	Cases ;
+N43:oivj	Cases ;
+N43:oiöm	Cases ;
+N43:ogbk	Cases ;
+N43:ohwå	Cases ;
+N43:oqös	Cases ;
+N43:opmz	Cases ;
+N43:ozän	Cases ;
+N43:odäp	Cases ;
+N43:ofzy	Cases ;
+N43:opkx	Cases ;
+N43:owwj	Cases ;
+N43:oadm	Cases ;
+N43:oäod	Cases ;
+N43:otca	Cases ;
+N43:orgl	Cases ;
+N43:ozyf	Cases ;
+N43:oäsc	Cases ;
+N43:oipp	Cases ;
+N43:ougö	Cases ;
+N43:ostv	Cases ;
+N43:ozyv	Cases ;
+N43:ocwp	Cases ;
+N43:oujb	Cases ;
+N43:oqff	Cases ;
+N43:oelö	Cases ;
+N43:oknå	Cases ;
+N43:ofzd	Cases ;
+N43:olöu	Cases ;
+N43:ojfh	Cases ;
+N43:oneö	Cases ;
+N43:opwx	Cases ;
+N43:orgz	Cases ;
+N43:owyl	Cases ;
+N43:oanh	Cases ;
+N43:oith	Cases ;
+N43:oähv	Cases ;
+N43:ofrm	Cases ;
+N43:ooex	Cases ;
+N43:ovyh	Cases ;
+N43:okum	Cases ;
+N43:omöu	Cases ;
+N43:owdo	Cases ;
+N43:ocbb	Cases ;
+N43:orvi	Cases ;
+N43:owqå	Cases ;
+N43:olqy	Cases ;
+N43:oäqd	Cases ;
+N43:odyt	Cases ;
+N43:ogqö	Cases ;
+N43:oqlo	Cases ;
+N43:oäea	Cases ;
+N43:oörn	Cases ;
+N43:oruv	Cases ;
+N43:oalx	Cases ;
+N43:ojay	Cases ;
+N43:oväj	Cases ;
+N43:oumq	Cases ;
+N43:oxgd	Cases ;
+N43:ozöz	Cases ;
+N43:olnf	Cases ;
+N43:oixc	Cases ;
+N43:otwm	Cases ;
+N43:oäkk	Cases ;
+N43:oqmn	Cases ;
+N43:oöpö	Cases ;
+N43:onåo	Cases ;
+N43:oshf	Cases ;
+N43:odbc	Cases ;
+N43:oiåq	Cases ;
+N43:oumm	Cases ;
+N43:opdö	Cases ;
+N43:otäc	Cases ;
+N43:ohpp	Cases ;
+N43:othe	Cases ;
+N43:omyn	Cases ;
+N43:oädä	Cases ;
+N43:ofag	Cases ;
+N43:oajä	Cases ;
+N43:oålr	Cases ;
+N43:oröå	Cases ;
+N43:oaod	Cases ;
+N43:oxyg	Cases ;
+N43:oöov	Cases ;
+N43:oiad	Cases ;
+N43:obhb	Cases ;
+N43:obzu	Cases ;
+N43:olpr	Cases ;


LEXICON N44	
+N44:pöme	Cases ;
+N44:plvw	Cases ;
+N44:pfkj	Cases ;
+N44:pcte	Cases ;
+N44:päwj	Cases ;
+N44:pemv	Cases ;
+N44:pnvv	Cases ;
+N44:ptot	Cases ;
+N44:popo	Cases ;
+N44:pjpö	Cases ;
+N44:ppmv	Cases ;
+N44:pkrd	Cases ;
+N44:pzäz	Cases ;
+N44:ptar	Cases ;
+N44:pzok	Cases ;
+N44:poce	Cases ;
+N44:puöq	Cases ;
+N44:prfc	Cases ;
+N44:pdxv	Cases ;
+N44:pönk	Cases ;
+N44:phkt	Cases ;
+N44:povj	Cases ;
+N44:pqlu	Cases ;
+N44:peyg	Cases ;
+N44:pmkw	Cases ;
+N44:pcme	Cases ;
+N44:psdi	Cases ;
+N44:pnen	Cases ;
+N44:pkpo	Cases ;
+N44:pbvr	Cases ;
+N44:pvtl	Cases ;
+N44:pwlö	Cases ;
+N44:pkqb	Cases ;
+N44:plcb	Cases ;
+N44:pövm	Cases ;
+N44:pyöz	Cases ;
+N44:pwty	Cases ;
+N44:pptt	Cases ;
+N44:pfän	Cases ;
+N44:peöp	Cases ;
+N44:ppgf	Cases ;
+N44:ptsr	Cases ;
+N44:pwef	Cases ;
+N44:pkex	Cases ;
+N44:pbsi	Cases ;
+N44:panc	Cases ;
+N44:pjgm	Cases ;
+N44:pxah	Cases ;
+N44:phtä	Cases ;
+N44:pdts	Cases ;
+N44:päqa	Cases ;
+N44:pgfc	Cases ;
+N44:pyhz	Cases ;
+N44:pizö	Cases ;
+N44:pånq	Cases ;
+N44:pysä	Cases ;
+N44:poep	Cases ;
+N44:pgvq	Cases ;
+N44:pbge	Cases ;
+N44:pakc	Cases ;
+N44:pyus	Cases ;
+N44:pclk	Cases ;
+N44:pmyl	Cases ;
+N44:pnöj	Cases ;
+N44:pguz	Cases ;
+N44:pbhi	Cases ;
+N44:psju	Cases ;
+N44:plnc	Cases ;
+N44:phrg	Cases ;
+N44:pääc	Cases ;
+N44:pzhl	Cases ;
+N44:pcxm	Cases ;
+N44:plai	Cases ;
+N44:pxbz	Cases ;
+N44:pläw	Cases ;
+N44:påts	Cases ;
+N44:ppdc	Cases ;
+N44:prkb	Cases ;
+N44:pvöe	Cases ;
+N44:pqto	Cases ;
+N44:pjya	Cases ;
+N44:påöd	Cases ;
+N44:potu	Cases ;
+N44:pmqö	Cases ;
+N44:pväm	Cases ;
+N44:pmym	Cases ;
+N44:pmrr	Cases ;
+N44:pxrä	Cases ;
+N44:påxu	Cases ;
+N44:pbxs	Cases ;
+N44:pntq	Cases ;
+N44:pläv	Cases ;
+N44:pgym	Cases ;
+N44:pdxh	Cases ;
+N44:ptmm	Cases ;
+N44:pmaq	Cases ;
+N44:pmyp	Cases ;
+N44:pzrg	Cases ;
+N44:pång	Cases ;

LEXICON Root
l N41 ;
n N42 ;
o N43 ;
p N44 ;
